Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2978.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; northeast airport ramp The sum of $3,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to distribute to the city of Prescott for the second phase of development for the northeast airport ramp.